Utah statutes.
62A-4a-105.5.   Employees -- Failure to comply with policy -- Termination.

(1)  The director shall ensure that all employees are fully trained to comply with state and federal law, administrative rules, and division policy in order to effectively carry out their assigned duties and functions.

(2)  If, after training and supervision, the employee consistently fails to comply with those laws, rules, and policies, his employment with the division shall be terminated.

